Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [306.98] BURIAL; RITES OF RECOGNIZED RELIGION. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "green burial" has the meaning given in section 149A.02, subdivision 42. new text end new text begin (b) A municipality, town, or other cemetery governed by this chapter must permit an individual to be buried in accordance with the rites of the individual's recognized religion, including but not limited to permitting an individual to be buried by green burial, if the burial is performed in compliance with chapter 149A and, for green burials, in compliance with chapter 149A and section 306.991. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 306.991, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Green burial requirements. A municipality, town, or other cemetery governed by this chapter deleted text begin that allows fordeleted text end new text begin must allownew text end green burialsnew text begin . A green burialnew text end must comply with the requirements of this section. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 306.991, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Burial density. new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end green burial plots must be a maximum of 300 burials per acre over a 100-year period. new text begin (b) A municipality, town, or other cemetery governed by this chapter must permit green burials at a greater density than the density specified in paragraph (a) for green burials of individuals for whom green burial is an element of the burial rites of the individual's recognized religion. new text end